tests/информаци.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах информаци":
    информаци<n><nom> :  информаци 
    информаци<n><gen> :  информацин 
    информаци<n><dat> :  информацие 
    информаци<n><loc> :  информацире 
    информаци<n><abl> :  информацирен 
    информаци<n><ins> :  информаципе 
    информаци<n><abe> :  информацисӗр 
    информаци<n><ben> :  информацишӗн
    информаци<n><px1sg><nom> :  информацийӗм 
    информаци<n><px1sg><gen> :  информацийӗмӗн 
    информаци<n><px1sg><dat> :  информацийӗме 
    информаци<n><px1sg><loc> :  информацийӗмре 
    информаци<n><px1sg><abl> :  информацийӗмрен 
    информаци<n><px1sg><ins> :  информацийӗмпе 
    информаци<n><px1sg><abe> :  информацийӗмсӗр 
    информаци<n><px1sg><ben> :  информацийӗмшӗн
    информаци<n><px2sg><nom> :  информацийӳ 
    информаци<n><px2sg><gen> :  информацийӳн 
    информаци<n><px2sg><dat> :  информацийӳне 
    информаци<n><px2sg><loc> :  информацийӳнте 
    информаци<n><px2sg><abl> :  информацийӳнтен 
    информаци<n><px2sg><ins> :  информацийӳпе 
    информаци<n><px2sg><abe> :  информацийӳсӗр 
    информаци<n><px2sg><ben> :  информацийӳшӗн
    информаци<n><px3sp><nom> :  информацийӗ 
    информаци<n><px3sp><gen> :  информацийӗн 
    информаци<n><px3sp><dat> :  информацине 
    информаци<n><px3sp><loc> :  информацийӗнче
    информаци<n><px3sp><abl> :  информацийӗнчен
    информаци<n><px3sp><ins> :  информацийӗпе 
    информаци<n><px3sp><abe> :  информацийӗсӗр 
    информаци<n><px3sp><ben> :  информацийӗшӗн
    информаци<n><px1pl><nom> :  информацийӗмӗр 
    информаци<n><px1pl><gen> :  информацийӗмӗрӗн 
    информаци<n><px1pl><dat> :  информацийӗмӗре 
    информаци<n><px1pl><loc> :  информацийӗмӗрте 
    информаци<n><px1pl><abl> :  информацийӗмӗртен 
    информаци<n><px1pl><ins> :  информацийӗмӗрпе 
    информаци<n><px1pl><abe> :  информацийӗмӗрсӗр 
    информаци<n><px1pl><ben> :  информацийӗмӗршӗн
    информаци<n><px2pl><nom> :  информацийӗр 
    информаци<n><px2pl><gen> :  информацийӗрӗн 
    информаци<n><px2pl><dat> :  информацийӗре 
    информаци<n><px2pl><loc> :  информацийӗрте 
    информаци<n><px2pl><abl> :  информацийӗртен 
    информаци<n><px2pl><ins> :  информацийӗрпе 
    информаци<n><px2pl><abe> :  информацийӗрсӗр 
    информаци<n><px2pl><ben> :  информацийӗршӗн
    информаци<n><pl><nom> :  информацисем 
    информаци<n><pl><gen> :  информацисен 
    информаци<n><pl><dat> :  информацисене 
    информаци<n><pl><loc> :  информацисенче 
    информаци<n><pl><abl> :  информацисенчен 
    информаци<n><pl><ins> :  информацисемпе 
    информаци<n><pl><abe> :  информацисемсӗр 
    информаци<n><pl><ben> :  информацисемшӗн
    информаци<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  информацийӗмсем 
    информаци<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  информацийӗмсен 
    информаци<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  информацийӗмсене 
    информаци<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  информацийӗмсенче 
    информаци<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  информацийӗмсенчен 
    информаци<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  информацийӗмсемпе 
    информаци<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  информацийӗмсемсӗр 
    информаци<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  информацийӗмсемшӗн
    информаци<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  информацийӳсем 
    информаци<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  информацийӳсен 
    информаци<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  информацийӳсене 
    информаци<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  информацийӳсенче 
    информаци<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  информацийӳсенчен 
    информаци<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  информацийӳсемпе 
    информаци<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  информацийӳсемсӗр 
    информаци<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  информацийӳсемшӗн
    информаци<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  информацийӗсем 
    информаци<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  информацийӗсен 
    информаци<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  информацийӗсене 
    информаци<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  информацийӗсенче 
    информаци<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  информацийӗсенчен 
    информаци<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  информацийӗсемпе 
    информаци<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  информацийӗсемсӗр 
    информаци<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  информацийӗсемшӗн
    информаци<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  информацийӗмӗрсем 
    информаци<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  информацийӗмӗрсен 
    информаци<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  информацийӗмӗрсене 
    информаци<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  информацийӗмӗрсенче 
    информаци<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  информацийӗмӗрсенчен 
    информаци<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  информацийӗмӗрсемпе 
    информаци<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  информацийӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    информаци<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  информацийӗмӗрсемшӗн
    информаци<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  информацийӗрсем 
    информаци<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  информацийӗрсен 
    информаци<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  информацийӗрсене 
    информаци<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  информацийӗрсенче 
    информаци<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  информацийӗрсенчен 
    информаци<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  информацийӗрсемпе 
    информаци<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  информацийӗрсемсӗр 
    информаци<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  информацийӗрсемшӗн
